California, session 20252026, AB1476.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18327 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18327. The state plan referred to in Section 18326 shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(a) Establishment of projects that, five or more days per week, provide at least one meal per day, either served in an in-person setting, or provided for to-go pickup to be consumed in a virtual congregate setting by eligible individuals, and any additional meals the contracting agency or organization may elect to provide.(b) Provision of nutrition projects for individuals 60 years of age or older who are eligible.(c) Furnishing of sites for nutrition projects in close proximity to concentrations of eligible individuals’ residences, such as schools, churches, senior centers, and facilities serving older adults.(d) Utilization of administrative methods to ensure maximum participation of eligible individuals.(e) Provision of special menus, when feasible, to meet particular dietary needs arising from health or religious requirements or ethnic backgrounds.(f) Provision of settings conducive to including, as a part of these projects, recreational activities, information, health and wellness counseling, and referral services.(g) Provision of appropriate modes of transportation, when feasible, essential to maximum participation of eligible individuals confined to their homes.(h) Establishment and administration of projects with the advice of persons competent in the field and of older Californians who will themselves participate in the program.(i) Nutrition education.SEC. 2. Section 18327.4 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:18327.4. Notwithstanding any other law, meals served or provided to be consumed outside of an in-person setting or a virtual congregate setting may be provided under the Home Delivered Nutrition Services program established pursuant to Subpart II (commencing with Section 3030f) of Part C of Subchapter III of Chapter 35 of Title 42 of the United States Code. Meals that are served or provided as described in this section shall comply with the federal requirements governing that program.